District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1749

Exemptions.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 12, 30 DCR 390
Oct. 8, 1983, D.C. Law 5-31, § 10(d), 30 DCR 3879
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(j), 31 DCR 4023
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-116, § 3, 45 DCR 19
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(m), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1931.